Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-2,126
Priority date.

Any water appropriation transferred to a tract of land under sections 46-2,122 to 46-2,125 shall retain the original priority date for the water appropriation.

Laws 1995, LB 99, § 7.